Hawaii statutes.
§321-38 Hawaii children's trust fund
advisory committee. There is established the Hawaii children's trust fund
advisory committee as provided in section 350B-6. The advisory committee shall
have the functions as provided in section 350B-6(b). [L 1984, c 212, pt of §2;
am L 1993, c 336, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next